Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-226.01
Application for recognition of incidental underground water storage; procedure.

Any person having an approved perfected appropriation may file with the Chief Water Officer an application for recognition of incidental underground water storage associated with such appropriation on a form prescribed and furnished by the Chief Water Officer without cost. Upon receipt of an application, the Chief Water Officer shall proceed in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Chief Water Officer.

Laws 1983, LB 198, § 5;

Laws 1985, LB 488, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 72.